Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Director’s office ........................ $ 1,460,929
(2) Central services ........................ $ 17,842,492
(3) Parks development.................... $ 17,548,816
(4) Direct services .......................... $ 68,198,128
(5) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 21,358,995
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Parks and  Natural Resources Fund to
the State Parks and Recreation Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Director’s office ........................ $ 1,681,651
(2) Central services ........................ $ 17,611,333
(3) Parks development.................... $ 23,993,420
(4) Direct services .......................... $ 53,852,345
(5) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 17,765,880
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,374,100 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the State Parks and Recreation Department for  the payment
of debt service.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
Enrolled Senate Bill 5527 (SB 5527-A) Page 1
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the State Parks and Recreation De-
partment for the following purposes:
(1) Parks development.................... $ 1,810,132
(2) Direct services .......................... $ 2,333,020
(3) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 12,547,291
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate May 16, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5527 (SB 5527-A) Page 2